California, session 20252026, AB1240.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Title 8 (commencing with Section 945.20) is added to Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, to read:TITLE 8. Single-Family Residential Property945.20. (a) For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:(1) “Business entity” means any association, company, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, real estate investment trust, or other legal entity, and that entity’s successors, assignees, or affiliates, but does not include either of the following:(A) A nonprofit corporation or other nonprofit legal entity.(B) A person or entity primarily engaged in the construction of new housing.(2) “Single-family residential property” means a single parcel of real property improved with only one detached dwelling unit on it for which a certificate of occupancy has been issued.(b) (1) A business entity that has an interest in more than 1,000 single-family residential properties shall not purchase, acquire, or otherwise obtain an ownership interest in another single-family residential property and subsequently lease the property. The seller shall have no liability for a violation of this section.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a single-family residential property constructed for the purpose of leasing in which the business entity has an ownership interest in the construction or is the initial purchaser of the constructed property.(c) (1) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in the name of the people of the State of California for a violation of this section.(2) If the Attorney General prevails in a civil action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall order all of the following:(A) The business entity to pay a civil penalty of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation of this section.(B) The business entity to sell the property to an independent third party within one year of the date that the court enters the judgment.(C) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(D) Any other relief the court deems appropriate.(3) This subdivision shall be the exclusive means of enforcing this section.